Massachusetts, session 194th, H2364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section XX: (a) As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
“Home healthcare employer” any agency or organization employing home healthcare
workers.
“Home healthcare worker” an individual who provides healthcare services in the home,
including but not limited to, nurses, physical therapists, and occupational therapists.
of 8

“Workplace Violence”, conduct at the work site that is: (i) an unpermitted or harmful
touching of another person; (ii) an attempt or act to use some degree of physical force on another
person; or (iii) engaging in conduct that could be reasonably perceived as an intent to touch
without permission, use immediate physical force or injure a particular person now or in the
future, that if carried out would constitute a crime, and causes another person to reasonably
believe that the person has the intent and ability to carry out such conduct.
(b) Home healthcare employers shall provide annual comprehensive workplace safety
training to all home healthcare workers. Employee training shall include methods of reporting to
appropriate public safety officials, bodies or agencies and processes necessary for the filing of
criminal charges.
(c) each healthcare employer shall have develop and implement a program to minimize
the danger of workplace violence to home healthcare workers, which shall include appropriate
employee training, communication plans to ensure healthcare worker safety and a system for the
ongoing reporting and monitoring of incidents and situations involving violence or the risk of
violence.
(d) prior to the provision of services by a home healthcare worker, a home healthcare
employer shall conduct a safety assessment of any setting in which home healthcare services are
to be provided. This assessment shall include, but not be limited to (i) the patient’s current
psychiatric, psychological, cognitive and emotional status, (ii) any patient history of violent
behavior, (iii) any patient history of substance use disorder, (iv) the presence or anticipated
presence of any other individual or individuals and any history of violent behavior associated
of 8

with said individual or individuals, and (v) the presence of any weapons and how they are
secured.
(e) the safety assessment shall be used to develop or modify the delivery of home
healthcare services to meet both patient needs and home healthcare worker safety.
(f) home healthcare employers shall provide home healthcare workers with cellular
phones or other two-way communication devices and hand-held alarms or noise devices for use
during home healthcare visits.
(f) Home healthcare workers shall be permitted refuse to do provide services in any
situation where the home healthcare worker has (i) where possible, requested a home healthcare
employer to eliminate the danger previously and (ii) genuinely believes an imminent danger
exists. Home healthcare workers shall not face a loss of compensation nor disciplinary action for
refusing services if these conditions are met.
(g) Each home healthcare employer shall designate a senior manager responsible for the
development and support of an in-house crisis response team for home healthcare worker-victims
of workplace violence. Said team shall implement an assaulted staff action program that
includes, but is not limited to, group crisis interventions, individual crisis counseling, staff
victims’ support groups, home healthcare worker victims’ family crisis intervention, peer-help
and professional referrals.
(h) Any home healthcare employer who violates any rule, regulation or requirement made
by the department under authority hereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than $2,000 for
each violation. The department or its representative or any aggrieved employee, any interested
party or any officer of any labor union or association, whether incorporated or otherwise, may
of 8

file a written complaint with the district court in the jurisdiction of which the violation occurs
and shall promptly notify the attorney general in writing of such complaint. The attorney general,
upon determination that there is a violation of any workplace standard relative to the protection
of the occupational health and safety of employees or of any standard of requirement of
licensure, may order any work site to be closed by way of the issuance of a cease and desist order
enforceable in the appropriate courts of the commonwealth.
(i) No home healthcare worker shall be penalized by a home healthcare employer in any
way as a result of such worker’s filing of a complaint or otherwise providing notice to the
department in regard to the occupational health and safety of such home healthcare worker or
their fellow home healthcare workers exposed to workplace violence risk factors.
(j) Not less than every 180 days, each home healthcare employer shall submit a report, on
a form prescribed by the commissioner of the department, of all incidents of workplace violence
reported to the home healthcare employer that involved a home healthcare worker. The report
shall be submitted to the department and the office of the district attorney for the county where
the incident occurred . Not more than 90 days after receiving the reports, the department shall
make the aggregate data statewide and by county publicly available; provided that the
department categorize the aggregate data by occupation and incident type.
SECTION 2. Chapter 149 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 52E the following section:-
(a) Section 52F. (As used in this section, the following words shall, unless the context
clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:-
of 8

“Home healthcare employer” any agency or organization employing home healthcare
workers.
“Home healthcare worker” an individual who provides healthcare services in the home,
including but not limited to, nurses, physical therapists, and occupational therapists.
(b) A home healthcare employer shall permit home healthcare workers to take up to 7
days of leave from work in any 12 month period if: (i) the home healthcare worker is a victim of
an assault or assault and battery which occurred in the line of duty and (ii) the home healthcare
worker uses the leave to seek or obtain victim services or legal assistance; obtain a protective
order from a court; appear in court or before a grand jury; meet with a district attorney or other
law enforcement official; or to address other legal issues directly related to the assault or assault
and battery.
(c) The leave taken pursuant to subsection (b) shall be paid.
(d) A home healthcare employer may require a home healthcare worker to provide
documentation evidencing that the home healthcare worker is a victim of assault or assault and
battery sustained in the line of duty and that the leave taken is consistent with the conditions of
subsection (b). A home healthcare worker shall provide such documentation to the home
healthcare employer within 5 business days after the home healthcare employer requests
documentation relative to the home healthcare worker’s absence.
(e) A home healthcare worker seeking leave from work pursuant to subsection (b) shall
provide advance notice of the leave to the home healthcare employer in accordance with the
employer's leave policy; provided, however, that if a home healthcare worker is absent on an
unauthorized basis, the home healthcare employer shall not take any negative action against the
of 8

home healthcare worker if the home healthcare worker, within 30 days from the unauthorized
absence or within 30 days from the last unauthorized absence in the instance of consecutive days
of unauthorized absences, provides documentation that the unauthorized absence meets the
criteria of subsection (b).
(f) All information related to the home healthcare worker’s leave taken pursuant to this
100 section shall be kept confidential by the home healthcare employer and shall not be disclosed,
101 except to the extent that disclosure is: (i) requested or consented to, in writing, by the home
102 healthcare worker; (ii) ordered to be released by a court of competent jurisdiction; (iii) required
103 by federal or state law; (iv) required in the course of an investigation authorized by law
104 enforcement, including, but not limited to, an investigation by the attorney general; or (v)
105 necessary to protect the safety of the home healthcare worker or others employed at the
106 workplace.
107 (g) No home healthcare employer shall require a home healthcare worker to exhaust all
108 annual leave, vacation leave, personal leave or sick leave available to the home healthcare
109 worker prior to requesting or taking leave under this section.
110 (h) No home healthcare employer shall coerce, interfere with, restrain or deny the
111 exercise of, or any attempt to exercise, any rights provided by this section or to make leave
112 requested or taken hereunder contingent upon whether or not the victim maintains contact with
113 the alleged abuser.
114 (i) No home healthcare employer shall discharge or in any other manner discriminate
115 against an home healthcare worker for exercising the home healthcare worker’s rights under this
116 section. A home healthcare worker who takes leave under this section shall not lose any
of 8

117 employment benefit accrued prior to the date on which the leave taken under this section
118 commenced as a result of taking said leave. Upon the home healthcare worker’s return from said
119 leave, the home healthcare worker shall be entitled to restoration to the home healthcare
120 worker’s original job or to an equivalent position.
121 (j) Each home healthcare employer shall post in a conspicuous place accessible by home
122 healthcare workers a notice prepared or approved by the department indicating the rights and
123 responsibilities provided by this section. The notice shall be issued in English, Spanish, Chinese,
124 Haitian Creole, Italian, Portuguese, Vietnamese, Laotian, Khmer, Russian and any other
125 language that is the primary language of at least 10,000 or ½ of one per cent of all residents of
126 the commonwealth. The required workplace notice shall be in English and each language other
127 than English which is the primary language of 5 or more home healthcare workers or self-
128 employed individuals of that workplace, if such notice is available from the department. Each
129 home healthcare employer shall notify each home healthcare worker not more than 30 days from
130 the beginning date of the home healthcare worker’s employment, the rights and responsibilities
131 provided by this section, including those related to notification requirements and confidentiality.
132 (k) This section shall not be construed to exempt an employer from complying with
133 chapter 258B, section 14B of chapter 268 or any other general or special law or to limit the rights
134 of any home healthcare worker under said chapter 258B, said section 14B of chapter 268 or any
135 other general or special law.
136 SECTION 3. Section 13I of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020
137 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
of 8

138 Any home healthcare worker who is the victim of assault or assault and battery in the line
139 of duty shall be given the option of providing the address of the home healthcare employer or of
140 the labor organization in which they are a member in good standing. In instances where the
141 address of the home healthcare employer is used or labor organization to which the home
142 healthcare worker is a member in good standing, the home healthcare employer or labor
143 organization shall ensure that the individual receives any documents pertaining to the assault or
144 assault and battery within 24 hours of receipt by the home healthcare employer or labor
145 organization. The home healthcare employer or labor organization shall demonstrate that it has
146 provided any and all documentation by obtaining a signature from the individual acknowledging
147 receipt.
of 8